Idaho, session 2025, H0032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2362, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2362. MASK MANDATES PROHIBITED. (1) Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary:
(a) Neither the state nor a political subdivision may mandate that an
individual in this state must use a medical face mask, face shield, or
other face covering for the purpose of preventing or slowing the spread
of a contagious or infectious disease;
(b) An official may not mandate that an individual in this state must
use a medical face mask, face shield, or other face covering for the pur-
pose of preventing or slowing the spread of a contagious or infectious
disease;
(c) A medical face mask, face shield, or face covering shall not be re-
quired by the state, a political subdivision, or an official as a condi-
tion for entry, education, employment, or other services; and
(d) If the state, a political subdivision, or an official recommends
using a medical face mask, face shield, or face covering to prevent or
slow the spread of a contagious or infectious disease, such recommen-
dation shall be accompanied by a notice that the recommendation is not
mandatory.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Official" means an officer or an employee of the state or a politi-
cal subdivision thereof.
(b) "Political subdivision" means a county, city, public health dis-
trict, school district, special purpose district, or other district or
municipality organized under any general or special law of this state,
except the term "political subdivision" does not include any hospital
or health care facility.
(c) "State" means the state of Idaho or any of its agencies, boards,
commissions, departments, divisions, or institutions, including any
state institution of higher education, except the term "state" does not
include any hospital or health care facility.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to restrict the re-
quirement of face masks in any vocational setting where the wearing of a pro-
tective face mask is a mandatory requirement and necessary to perform re-


quired job duties. The exemption in this subsection is strictly limited to
those working in roles where face masks are an integral and compulsory safety
component of required job duties, which includes but is not limited to health
care professionals, individuals working with hazardous materials or biohaz-
ards, and workers in industrial environments where respiratory protection
is vocationally required.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to restrict the use of
face masks to address any behavioral risk in any facility to which an indi-
vidual is confined, including hospitalization of the mentally ill pursuant
to chapter 3, title 66, Idaho Code, and correctional facilities as defined in
chapter 1, title 18, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.